Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 3
STUDENT LOAN MATCHING

23-3.3-301. Student loan matching program - funding.

Out of any moneys provided for the financial assistance program authorized by section 23-3.3-102 and remaining after meeting the requirements of part 2 of this article, the commission shall provide the matching funds required for federal allocations to institutions for student loan programs.

Source:

L. 79:

Entire article added, p. 828, § 1, effective June 19.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 791, § 6, effective July 1.